Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 35
Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act

9-35-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-2.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Canada” means the sovereign nation of Canada and its provinces and territories. “Canadian” has a corresponding meaning.

“Canadian judgment” means a judgment of a court of Canada, other than a judgment that recognizes the judgment of another foreign country.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-3.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to a Canadian judgment to the extent the judgment is within the scope of §

9-34-3

, if recognition of the judgment is sought to enforce the judgment.

A Canadian judgment that grants both recovery of a sum of money and other relief may be registered under this chapter, but only to the extent of the grant of recovery of a sum of money.

A Canadian judgment regarding subject matter both within and not within the scope of this chapter may be registered under this chapter, but only to the extent the judgment is with regard to subject matter within the scope of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-4.
Registration of Canadian judgment.

A person seeking recognition of a Canadian judgment described in §

9-35-3

to enforce the judgment may register the judgment in the office of the clerk of a court in which an action for recognition of the judgment could be filed under §

9-34-6

.

A registration under subsection (a) of this section must be executed by the person registering the judgment or the person’s attorney and include:

A copy of the Canadian judgment authenticated in the same manner as a copy of a foreign judgment is authenticated in an action under §

9-34-6

as an accurate copy by the court that entered the judgment;

The name and address of the person registering the judgment;

If the person registering the judgment is not the person in whose favor the judgment was rendered, a statement describing the interest the person registering the judgment has in the judgment which entitles the person to seek its recognition and enforcement;

The name and last-known address of the person against whom the judgment is being registered;

If the judgment is of the type described in §

9-35-3(b)

or (c), a description of the part of the judgment being registered;

The amount of the judgment or part of the judgment being registered, identifying:

The amount of interest accrued as of the date of registration on the judgment or part of the judgment being registered, the rate of interest, the part of the judgment to which interest applies, and the date when interest began to accrue;

Costs and expenses included in the judgment or part of the judgment being registered, other than an amount awarded for attorneys’ fees; and

The amount of an award of attorneys’ fees included in the judgment or part of the judgment being registered;

The amount, as of the date of registration, of post-judgment costs, expenses, and attorneys’ fees claimed by the person registering the judgment or part of the judgment;

The amount of the judgment or part of the judgment being registered which has been satisfied as of the date of registration;

A statement that:

The judgment is final, conclusive, and enforceable under the law of the Canadian jurisdiction in which it was rendered;

The judgment or part of the judgment being registered is within the scope of this chapter; and

If a part of the judgment is being registered, the amounts stated in the registration under subsections (b)(6), (b)(7), and (b)(8) of this section relate to the part;

If the judgment is not in English, a certified translation of the judgment into English; and

A registration fee of one hundred sixty dollars ($160).

On receipt of a registration that includes the documents, information, and registration fee required by subsection (b) of this section, the clerk shall file the registration, assign a civil action number, and enter the Canadian judgment in the court’s docket.

A registration substantially in the following form complies with the registration requirements under subsection (b) of this section if the registration includes the attachments specified in the form:

REGISTRATION OF CANADIAN MONEY JUDGMENT Complete and file this form, together with the documents required by Part V of this form, with the Clerk of Court. When stating an amount of money, identify the currency in which the amount is stated. PART I. IDENTIFICATION OF CANADIAN JUDGMENT Canadian Court Rendering the Judgment: Case/Docket Number in Canadian Court: Name of Plaintiff(s): Name of Defendant(s): The Canadian Court entered the judgment on [date] in [city] [Province or Territory]. The judgment includes an award for the payment of money in favor of in the amount of . If only part of the Canadian judgment is subject to registration (see §

9-35-3(b)

and (c)), describe the part of the judgment being registered: PART II. IDENTIFICATION OF PERSON REGISTERING JUDGMENT AND PERSON AGAINST WHOM JUDGMENT IS BEING REGISTERED Provide the following information for all persons seeking to register the judgment under this registration and all persons against whom the judgment is being registered under this registration. Name of Person(s) Registering Judgment: If a person registering the judgment is not the person in whose favor the judgment was rendered, describe the interest the person registering the judgment has in the judgment which entitles the person to seek its recognition and enforcement: Address of Person(s) Registering Judgment: Additional Contact Information for Person(s) Registering Judgment (Optional): Telephone Number: FAX Number: Email Address: Name of Attorney for Person(s) Registering Judgment, if any: Address: Telephone Number: FAX Number: Email Address: Name of Person(s) Against Whom Judgment is Being Registered: Address of Person(s) Against Whom Judgment is Being Registered: (provide the most recent address known) Additional Contact Information for Person(s) Against Whom Judgment is Being Registered (Optional) (provide most recent information known): Telephone Number: FAX Number: Email Address: PART III. CALCULATION OF AMOUNT FOR WHICH ENFORCEMENT IS SOUGHT Identify the currency or currencies in which each amount is stated. The amount of the Canadian judgment or part of the judgment being registered is: . The amount of interest accrued as of the date of registration on the part of the judgment being registered is The applicable rate of interest is The date when interest began to accrue is The part of the judgment to which the interest applies is . The Canadian court awarded costs and expenses relating to the part of the judgment being registered in the amount of (exclude any amount included in the award of costs and expenses which represents an award of attorneys’ fees). The Canadian court awarded attorneys’ fees relating to the part of the judgment being registered in the amount of . The person registering the Canadian judgment claims post-judgment costs and expenses in the amount of and post-judgment attorneys’ fees in the amount of relating to the part of the judgment being registered (include only costs, expenses, and attorney’s fees incurred before registration). The amount of the part of the judgment being registered which has been satisfied as of the date of registration is . The total amount for which enforcement of the part of the judgment being registered is sought is . PART IV. STATEMENT OF PERSON REGISTERING JUDGMENT I, state: [Person Registering Judgment or Attorney for Person Registering Judgment] 1. The Canadian judgment is final, conclusive, and enforceable under the law of the Canadian jurisdiction in which it was rendered. 2. The Canadian judgment or part of the judgment being registered is within the scope of chapter 35 of title 9 of the Rhode Island General Laws. 3. If only a part of the Canadian judgment is being registered, the amounts stated in Part III of this form relate to that part. PART V. ITEMS REQUIRED TO BE INCLUDED WITH REGISTRATION Attached are (check to signify required items are included): A copy of the Canadian judgment authenticated in the same manner a copy of a foreign judgment is authenticated in an action under as an accurate copy by the Canadian court that entered the judgment. §

9-34-6

If the Canadian judgment is not in English, a certified translation of the judgment into English. A registration fee in the amount of one hundred sixty dollars ($160). I declare that the information provided on this form is true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief. Submitted by: Signature of [Person Registering Judgment] [Attorney for Person Registering Judgment] [specify whether signer is the person registering the judgment or that person’s attorney] Date of submission:

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-5.
Effect of registration.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a Canadian judgment registered under §

9-35-4

has the same effect provided in §

9-34-7

for a judgment a court determines to be entitled to recognition.

A Canadian judgment registered under §

9-35-4

may not be enforced by sale or other disposition of property, or by seizure of property or trustee process, until thirty-one (31) days after notice under §

9-35-6

of registration is served. The court for cause may provide for a shorter or longer time. This subsection does not preclude use of relief available under law of this state other than this chapter to prevent dissipation, disposition, or removal of property.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-6.
Notice of registration.

A person that registers a Canadian judgment under §

9-35-4

shall cause notice of registration to be served on the person against whom the judgment has been registered.

Notice under this section must be served in the same manner that a summons and complaint must be served in an action seeking recognition under §

9-34-6

of a foreign-country money judgment.

Notice under this section must include:

The date of registration and court in which the judgment was registered;

The civil action number assigned to the registration;

The name and address of:

The person registering the judgment; and

The person’s attorney, if any;

A copy of the registration, including the documents required under §

9-35-4(b)

; and

A statement that:

The person against whom the judgment has been registered, not later than thirty (30) days after the date of service of notice, may petition the court to vacate the registration; and

The court for cause may provide for a shorter or longer time.

Proof of service of notice under this section must be filed with the clerk of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-7.
Petition to vacate registration.

Not later than thirty (30) days after notice under §

9-35-6

is served, the person against whom the judgment was registered may petition the court to vacate the registration. The court for cause may provide for a shorter or longer time for filing the petition.

A petition under this section may assert only:

A ground that could be asserted to deny recognition of the judgment under chapter 34 of title 9; or

A failure to comply with a requirement of this chapter for registration of the judgment.

A petition filed under this section does not itself stay enforcement of the registered judgment.

If the court grants a petition under this section, the registration is vacated, and any act under the registration to enforce the registered judgment is void.

If the court grants a petition under this section on a ground under subsection (b)(1) of this section, the court also shall render a judgment denying recognition of the Canadian judgment. A judgment rendered under this subsection has the same effect as a judgment denying recognition to a judgment on the same ground under chapter 34 of title 9.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-8.
Stay of enforcement of judgment pending determination of petition.

A person that files a petition under §

9-35-7(a)

to vacate registration of a Canadian judgment may request the court to stay enforcement of the judgment pending determination of the petition. The court shall grant the stay if the person establishes a likelihood of success on the merits with regard to a ground listed in §

9-35-7(b)

for vacating a registration. The court may require the person to provide security in an amount determined by the court as a condition of granting the stay.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-9.
Relationship to uniform foreign-country money judgments recognition act.

This chapter supplements chapter 34 of title 9 and that chapter, other than §

9-34-6

, applies to a registration under this chapter.

A person may seek recognition of a Canadian judgment described in §

9-35-3

either:

By registration under this chapter; or

Under §

9-34-6

.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a person may not seek recognition in this state of the same judgment or part of a judgment described in §

9-35-3(b)

or (c) with regard to the same person under both this chapter and §

9-34-6

.

If the court grants a petition to vacate a registration solely on a ground under §

9-35-7(b)(2)

, the person seeking registration may:

If the defect in the registration can be cured, file a new registration under this chapter; or

Seek recognition of the judgment under §

9-34-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-10.
Uniformity of application and interpretation.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-11.
Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to the registration of a Canadian judgment entered in a proceeding that is commenced in Canada on or after the effective date of this chapter [July 3, 2021].

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

9-35-12.
Official comments.

It is the intention of the general assembly that the official comments to the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act as approved and recommended for enactment in all the States by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws in 2019 represent the express legislative intent of the general assembly and shall be used as a guide for interpretation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.